src/fst/morphology/affixes/Der_vv_IV.lexc
+RUJUP+Der/vv+SUAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rujussuartariaqaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv:rujoor IV-mod_rujuur ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:rujuuginnar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rujuuginnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:rujoorniar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rujoorniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:rujoorsima IV-mod_V ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv:rujoorsimaar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rujoorsimaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+SIMAAR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:rujoorsimaartip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:rujoorsinnar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rujoorsinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:rujuussa IV-mod_ssa ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:rujoortip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ; !28052020 panie
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:rujoortuar IV-mod_rujuur ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rujoortuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUJUUR+Der/vv+UTIGE+Der/vv:rujuujutig flex-iv_schwa ;
+RULUP+Der/vv:rulup IV-mod_C ;
+RULUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rulukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv:ruloor IV-mod_C ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rulooraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:ruluunngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ruluunngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+QQIP+Der/vv:rulooqqip IV-mod_iC ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+QQIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rulooqqikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+QQIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:rulooqqikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:rulooriar IV-mod_C ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rulooriaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:ruloorsima IV-mod_V ;
+RULUUR+Der/vv+TARE+Der/vv:ruloortar flex-iv_schwa ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv:rusaar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv:rusaaruma IV-mod_V ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:rusaaginnar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusaaginnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:rusaaginnarniar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusaaginnarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:rusaaginnassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:rusaarniar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusaarniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:rusaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv:rusaaqqaar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusaaqqaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv:rusaaqqaartariaqar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv+TARIAQAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusaaqqaartariaqaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:rusaassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:rusaartip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:rusaartuar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusaartuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:rusaartuaannar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusaartuaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+NIKUU+Der/vv:rusaartuarnikuu IV-mod_V ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv:rusaartuarpasip IV-mod_iC ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:rusaartuarsima IV-mod_V ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:rusaartuarsinnar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:rusaartuarsinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUSAAR+Der/vv+UTIGE+Der/vv:rusaajutig flex-iv_schwa ;
+RUTTUR+Der/vv:ruttor IV-mod_C ;
+RUTTUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ruttoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUTTUR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:ruttorsima IV-mod_V ;
+RUTTUR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:ruttussa IV-mod_ssa ;
+RUUSAAR+Der/vv:ruusaar IV-mod_C ;
+RUUSAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ruusaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+RUUSAAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:ruusaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SSA+Der/vv:ssa IV-mod_ssa ;
+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+MI+Der/vv:ssagaluarmi XImioqX ;
+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:ssagalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+SSA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:ssagunar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssagunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:ssagunanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SSA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssagunanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:ssagunanngikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+SSA+Der/vv+GUNNAR+Der/vv+SI+Der/vv:ssajunnarsi flex-iv_voq ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NASUGE+Der/vv:ssanasug HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv:ssanga flex-iv_voq ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:ssaajunnar IV-mod_nar ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:ssanganarneru IV-mod_V ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:ssanganngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssanganngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:ssangatip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+TSAP+Der/vv:ssangatsap IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+TSAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssangatsakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NIRAR+Der/vv:ssanerar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:ssanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:ssanngikkallar gallar-iv ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:ssanngilluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssanngilluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:ssanngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssanngivikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:ssannguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssannguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:ssa%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+SSA+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv:ssaqqaar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssaqqaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSA+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:ssasima IV-mod_V ;
+SSA+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:ssasimanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SSA+Der/vv+SURE+Der/vv:ssasor HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+SSA+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:ssatip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv:ssaar ssaar_vv ; ! IV-mod_C
+SSAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv:ssaariartor IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssaariartoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:ssaarluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssaarluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv:ssaarluinnaruma IV-mod_V ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssaarluinnarumagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:ssaarluinnarumaneru IV-mod_V ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:%ssaarluinnarumanerugaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv:ssaangajap IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssaangajakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:ssaangajalluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssaangajalluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:ssaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv:ssaaqqu HTR_V_SAQ_si ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:ssaarsima IV-mod_V ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:ssaassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssaassagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:ssaassagalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:ssaavip IV-mod_iC ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+SUR+Der/vv:ssaavissor IV-mod_C ;
+SSAAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+SUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssaavissoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv:ssamaar IV-mod_C ; 
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssamaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv:ssamaarpasip IV-mod_iC ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasikkunnaar IV-mod_iC ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasikkunnaariar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasikkunnaariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasilluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasilluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasingaar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasingaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:ssamaarpasinngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasinngilluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasinngilluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:ssamaarpasinngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:ssamaarpase%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpaseriar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpaseriaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasittuar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasittuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasittuaannar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssamaarpasittuaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:ssamaa%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+RUTTUR+Der/vv:ssamaaruttor IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+RUTTUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:ssamaaruttoraluar IV-mod_C ;
+SSAMAAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:ssamaavip IV-mod_iC ; 
+TALLAP+Der/vv:tallap IV-mod_C ;
+TALLAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tallakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+TIR+Der/vv:ter IV-mod_iC ;
+TIR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:terniar IV-mod_C ;
+TIR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:terniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+TIR+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv:teqqu HTR_V_SAQ_si ;
+TIR+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv:tereer IV-mod_iC ;
+TITIR+Der/vv:titer IV-mod_iC ;
+TSAALI+Der/vv:tsaali iSaq;
+TSAALI+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:tsaaliniar IV-mod_C ;
+TSAALIUR+Der/vv:tsaalior DOTR_r ;
+TSAP+Der/vv:tsap IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv:tsakkaluttuar IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsakkaluttuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:tsakkaluttuinnar IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+GALUTTUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsakkaluttuinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv:tsakkiartor IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv+RUSAAR+Der/vv:tsakkiartorusaar IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv:tsappalup IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsappalukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:tsassima IV-mod_V ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:tsatsip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv:tsaammer IV-mod_iC ;
+TSAP+Der/vv+UMMIR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsaammeraluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv:tsiar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:tsiarallar gallar-iv ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv:tsiaruma IV-mod_V ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+GUMA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsiarumagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:tsiaannar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsiaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv:tsialaar IV-mod_laar ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+LLATTAAR+Der/vv:tsiallattaar IV-mod_C ; !13022020 panie
+TSIAR+Der/vv+LLATTAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsiallattaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+QQU+Der/vv:tsiaqqu DOTR_IV_V ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:tsiariar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsiariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:tsiarsima IV-mod_V ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:tsiarsimagallar IV-mod_gallar ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:tsiarsinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsiarsinnaagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:tsiarsinnar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:tsiarsinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+TSIAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:tsiassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+UMI+Der/vv:%ProgIumi IV-mod_V ;
+UMI+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv:umilaar IV-mod_laar ;
+UMI+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:umilaariar IV-mod_C ;
+UMI+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:umilaariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+UMI+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:umeriar IV-mod_C ;
